Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-318
Authority to transact business; certificate of department; evidentiary effect.

A certificate under the seal of the department, relative to the authority of the company, insurance producer, business entity, or surplus lines licensee to transact business in this state upon any particular date, shall be received by any court in this state in lieu of the testimony of the director.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 26.